Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1851
Legislative intent.

It is the intent of the Legislature that sections 81-1843 to 81-1851 shall be construed as enabling the rights set forth in Article I, section 28, of the Constitution of Nebraska.

Laws 2004, LB 270, § 17.